Hawaii statutes.
§132D-9 Application for permit. The
permit required under section 132D-10 or 132D-16 shall be issued by the county
or its authorized designees and be nontransferable. The county or its
authorized designees shall issue all permits for which complete applications
have been submitted and which contain only correct information. The permit
shall specify the date of issuance or effect and the date of expiration but in
no case for a period to exceed one year. The permit for the purchase of
consumer fireworks for the purposes of section 132D-3 shall not allow purchase
for more than one event as set forth in section 132D-3. The application shall
be made on a form setting forth the dates for which the permit shall be valid,
the location where the permitted activity is to occur, and the name of the
proprietor or, if a partnership, the name of the partnership and the names of
all partners or, if a corporation, the name of the corporation and the names of
its officers. The permit application may be denied if the proposed use of
fireworks or articles pyrotechnic presents a substantial inconvenience to the
public or presents an unreasonable fire or safety hazard. Any permit issued
pursuant to this chapter shall be prominently displayed in public view at the
site. [L 1994, c 180, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 233, §9; am L 2006, c 54, §2 and c
183, §11]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next